Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 1. State Use Tax

§ 39-16-101.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Quarterly return” means a tax return for each of four (4) periods of three (3) consecutive months in a calendar year beginning with January, April, July or October;

“Retail sale” means the sale of tangible personal property to a person for storage, use or consumption and not for subsequent resale;

“Sale” means the transfer of title or possession of tangible personal property from a vendor for a consideration for storage, use or other consumption in Wyoming excluding the exchange or transfer of tangible personal property upon which the seller has directly or indirectly paid sales or use tax incidental to:

A division of partnership assets among the partners according to their interests in the partnership. As used in this subparagraph, “partnership” includes a limited partnership;

The formation of a corporation by the owners of a business and the transfer of their business assets to the corporation in exchange for all the corporation’s outstanding stock, except qualifying shares, in proportion to assets contributed;

The transfer of assets of shareholders in the formation or dissolution of professional corporations;

The dissolution and the pro rata distribution of the corporation’s assets to its stockholders;

The transfer of assets from a parent corporation to a subsidiary corporation which is owned at least eighty percent (80%) by the parent corporation, which transfer is solely in exchange for stock or securities of the subsidiary corporation;

The transfer of assets from a subsidiary corporation which is owned at least eighty percent (80%) by the parent corporation to a parent corporation or to another subsidiary which is owned at least eighty percent (80%) by the parent corporation, which transfer is solely in exchange for stock or securities of the parent corporation or the subsidiary which received the assets;

A transfer of a partnership interest;

The formation of a partnership by the transfer of assets to the partnership or transfers to a partnership in exchange for proportionate interests in the partnership;

The repossession of personal property by a chattel mortgage holder or foreclosure by a lienholder;

The transfer of assets between parent and closely held subsidiary corporations, or between subsidiary corporations closely held by the same parent corporation, or between affiliated companies, partnerships and corporations which are owned in similar percentages by the same persons. “Closely held subsidiary corporation” means a corporation in which the parent corporation owns stock possessing at least eighty percent (80%) of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote and owns at least eighty percent (80%) of the total number of shares of all other classes of stock;

The sale of a business entity when sold to a purchaser of all or not less than eighty percent (80%) of the value of all of the assets which are located in this state of the business entity when the purchaser continues to use the tangible personal property in the operation of an ongoing business entity in this state. As used in this subparagraph, “business entity” means and includes an individual, partnership, corporation, corporate division, joint stock company or any other association or entity, public or private, or separate business unit thereof.

“Sales price” means the consideration paid by the purchaser of tangible personal property excluding the actual trade-in value allowed on tangible personal property and manufacturer rebates for motor vehicles exchanged at the time of the transaction;

“Storage” means the keeping or retention in this state of tangible personal property purchased from a vendor for any purpose except for sale in the course of business or subsequent use outside the state;

“Tangible personal property” means all personal property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt or touched, or that is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. “Tangible personal property” includes electricity, water, gas, steam and prewritten computer software and includes any controlled substance as defined by W.S. 35-7-1002(a)(iv) which is not sold pursuant to a written prescription of or through a licensed practitioner as defined by W.S. 35-7-1002(a)(xx);

“Taxpayer” means the purchaser of tangible personal property, admissions or services which are subject to taxation under this article;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

“Use” means the exercise of any right or power over tangible personal property incident to ownership or by any transaction where possession is given by lease or contract;

“Vendor” means any person engaged in the business of selling at retail or wholesale tangible personal property, having or maintaining within this state, directly or by any subsidiary, an office, distribution house, sales house, warehouse or other place of business, or any agents operating or soliciting sales or advertising within this state under the authority of the vendor or its subsidiary, regardless of whether the place of business or agent is located in the state permanently or temporarily or whether the vendor or subsidiary is qualified to do business within this state. Agents acting under the authority of the vendor include but are not limited to truckers, peddlers, canvassers, salespersons, representatives, employees, supervisors, distributors, delivery persons or any other persons performing services in this state. “Vendor” also includes every person who engages in regular or systematic solicitation by three (3) or more separate transmittances of an advertisement or advertisements in any twelve (12) month period in a consumer market in this state by the distribution of catalogs, periodicals, advertising flyers, or other advertising, or by means of print, radio, television or other electronic media, by mail, telegraph, telephone, computer data base, cable, optic, microwave, satellite or other communication system for the purpose of effecting retail sales of tangible personal property;

“Tertiary production” means the crude oil recovered from a petroleum reservoir by means of a tertiary enhanced recovery project to which one (1) or more tertiary enhanced recovery techniques meeting the certification requirements of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission or the United States government are being applied;

“Purchase price” means “sales price” as defined under W.S.

39-15-101

;

“Directly and predominantly in manufacturing” means an item manufactured from inventoried raw or prepared material beginning at the point at which raw or prepared material is moved from plant inventory on a contiguous plant site and ending at a point at which manufacturing has altered the raw or prepared material to its completed form, including packaging, if required. Machinery used during the manufacturing process to move material from one direct production step to another in a continuous flow and machinery used in testing during the manufacturing process shall be deemed to be used directly and predominantly in manufacturing;

“Machinery” means all tangible personal property eligible for a use tax exemption pursuant to W.S. 39-16-105(a)(viii)(D), used to produce an article of tangible personal property. The term includes both the basic unit and any adjunct or attachment necessary for the basic unit to accomplish its intended function, the materials for the construction or repair of machinery, and machine tools;

“Manufacturing” means the operation of producing a new product, article, substance or commodity different from and having a distinctive nature, character or use from the raw or prepared material;

“NAICS” means the Northern American Industry Classification System manual of 2002 that organizes establishments into industries on the basis of the activity in which they are primarily engaged;

Telecommunications definitions:

“800 service” means a telecommunications service that allows a caller to dial a toll-free number without incurring a charge for the call. The service is typically marketed under the name “800”, “855”, “866”, “877” and “888” toll-free calling, and any subsequent numbers designated by the Federal Communications Commission;

“900 service” means an inbound toll telecommunications service purchased by a subscriber that allows the subscriber’s customers to call in to the subscriber’s prerecorded announcement or live service. 900 service shall not include the charge for collection services provided by the seller of the telecommunications services to the subscriber or service or product sold by the subscriber to the subscriber’s customer. The service is typically marketed under the name “900” service, and any subsequent numbers designated by the Federal Communications Commission;

“Ancillary services” means services that are associated with or incidental to the provision of telecommunications services, including but not limited to detailed telecommunications billing, directory assistance, vertical service and voice mail services;

“Coin-operated telephone service” means a telecommunications service paid for by inserting money into a telephone accepting direct deposits of money to operate;

“Conference bridging service” means an ancillary service that links two (2) or more participants of an audio or video conference call and may include the provision of a telephone number. Conference bridging service shall not include the telecommunications services used to reach the conference bridge;

“Detailed telecommunications billing service” means an ancillary service of separately stating information pertaining to individual calls on a customer’s billing statement;

“Directory assistance” means an ancillary service of providing telephone number information or address information;

“Fixed wireless service” means a telecommunications service that provides radio communication between fixed points;

“International” means a telecommunications service that originates or terminates in the United States and terminates or originates outside the United States, respectively. United States includes the District of Columbia or a United States territory or possession;

“Interstate” means a telecommunications service that originates in one (1) state of the United States or a United States territory or possession and terminates in a different state of the United States or a United States territory or possession;

“Intrastate” means a telecommunications service that originates in one (1) state of the United States or a United States territory or possession and terminates in the same state of the United States or a United States territory or possession;

“Mobile wireless service” means a telecommunications service that is transmitted, conveyed or routed regardless of the technology used, whereby the origination or termination points of the transmission, conveyance or routing are not fixed, including, by way of example only, telecommunications services that are provided by a commercial mobile radio service provider;

“Paging service” means a telecommunications service that provides transmission of coded radio signals for the purpose of activating specific pagers which transmissions may include messages or sounds;

“Pay telephone service” means a telecommunications service provided through any pay telephone;

“Prepaid calling service” means the right to access exclusively telecommunications services, which requires advance payment and which enables the origination of calls using an access number or authorization code, whether manually or electronically dialed, and that is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount;

“Prepaid wireless calling service” means a telecommunications service that provides the right to utilize mobile wireless service as well as other nontelecommunications services including the download of digital products delivered electronically, content and ancillary services, which require advance payment that is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount;

“Private communications service” means a telecommunications service that entitles the customer to exclusive or priority use of a communications channel or group of channels between or among termination points, regardless of the manner in which the channel or channels are connected, and includes switching capacity, extension lines, stations and any other associated services that are provided in connection with the use of the channel or channels;

“Residential telecommunications service” means a telecommunications service or ancillary services provided to an individual for personal use at a residential address, including an individual dwelling unit such as an apartment. In the case of institutions where individuals reside such as schools or nursing homes, telecommunications service is considered residential if it is provided to and paid for by an individual resident rather than the institution;

“Telecommunications service” means the electronic transmission, conveyance or routing of voice, data, audio, video, or any other information or signals to a point, or between or among points. The term telecommunications service includes such transmission, conveyance, or routing in which computer processing applications are used to act on the form, code or protocol of the content for purposes of transmission, conveyance or routing without regard to whether such service is referred to as voice over Internet protocol services or is classified by the Federal Communications Commission as enhanced or value added. Telecommunications service shall not include:

Data processing and information services that allow data to be generated, acquired, stored, processed, or retrieved and delivered by an electronic transmission to a purchaser where the purchaser’s primary purpose for the underlying transaction is the processed data or information;

Installation or maintenance of wiring or equipment on a customer’s premises;

Tangible personal property;

Advertising, including but not limited to directory advertising;

Billing and collection services provided to third parties;

Internet access service;

Radio and television audio and video programming services, regardless of the medium, including the furnishing of transmission, conveyance and routing of the services by the programming service provider. Radio and television audio and video programming services shall include but not be limited to cable service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 522(6) and audio and video programming services delivered by commercial mobile radio service providers, as defined in 47 C.F.R. 20.3;

Ancillary services; or

Digital products delivered electronically, including but not limited to software, music, video, reading materials or ring tones.

“Value-added nonvoice data service” means a service that otherwise meets the definition of telecommunications services in which computer processing applications are used to act on the form, content, code or protocol of the information or data primarily for a purpose other than transmission, conveyance or routing;

“Vertical service” means an ancillary service that is offered in connection with one (1) or more telecommunications services, which offers advanced calling features that allow customers to identify callers and to manage multiple calls and call connections, including conference bridging services;

“Voice mail service” means an ancillary service that enables the customer to store, send or receive recorded messages. Voice mail service does not include any vertical services that the customer may be required to have in order to utilize the voice mail service.

“Food for domestic home consumption” means substances whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried or dehydrated form that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed for their taste or nutritional value. “Food for domestic home consumption” does not include alcoholic beverages, tobacco or prepared foods;

“Prepared food”:

Includes:

Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;

Two (2) or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a single item; or

Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins or straws. A container or package used to transport the food is not an eating utensil.

Does not include:

Food that is only cut, repackaged or pasteurized by the seller;

Eggs, fish, meat, poultry or foods containing raw animal foods and which are required or recommended to be cooked by the consumer to prevent food borne illness;

Food sold by a seller whose proper primary NAICS classification is manufacturing in sector 311, except subsector 3118 dealing with bakeries;

Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single item; or

Bakery items including bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, danishes, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, tortillas and other bakery goods unless the item is sold as prepared food under subdivision (xlvi)(A)(III) of this subsection.

“Exempt motor vehicle” means any motor vehicle that is exempt from taxation under W.S.

39-15-106

. Upon transfer of title of an exempt motor vehicle, a county treasurer shall provide an applicant documentation noting any valid use tax exemption and a receipt specifying the amount of use tax collected.

Definitions under W.S.

39-15-101

shall apply to this article unless otherwise specified.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 77, § 1; 1999, ch. 59, § 1; ch. 132, § 1; 2001, ch. 147, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 48, § 1; 2004, ch. 27, § 1; 2005, ch. 5, § 2; ch. 31, § 1; 2006, ch. 10, § 1; 2007, ch. 10, § 1; ch. 140, § 1; 2011, ch. 34, § 1; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, inserted (a)(xiii) through (xvi).

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 5, § 2, rewrote (a)(vi), which formerly read: “‘Tangible personal property’ means all property not real or intangible.”

Laws 2005, ch. 5, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2005.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 31, § 1, substituted “2002” for “2003” in (a)(xvi).

Laws 2005, ch. 31, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 17, 2005.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2006 amendment,

effective January 1, 2008, amends this section effective January 1, 2008, by deleting “title or” following “transfer of” in (a)(iii) introductory paragraph.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 10, § 1, effective January 1, 2008, added (a)(xvii).

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, added (a)(xvii) (redesignated as (a)(xviii) by the legislative service office effective January 1, 2008.)

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, rewrote (a)(xviii), which formerly read: “‘Food’ means food for domestic home consumption as defined by department rule and regulation”; and added (a)(xix).

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “or dollars” for “of dollars” in (a)(xvii)(R).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a)(viii), which read: "1This article' means W.S.

39-16-101

through

39-16-111

."

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a)(iii) substituted “transfer of title or possession” for “transfer of possession”; and added (a)(xx).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 77, § 1, amended paragraph (a)(iii) of W.S. 39-6-502, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendment to § 39-6-402(a)(iii) by ch. 77 was subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

There is no subparagraph (a)(iii)(I), (a)(iii)(L), (a)(xvii)(I), (a)(xvii)(L), (a)(xvii)(V), or (a)(xvii)(X) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Sending supervisor into state not “doing business.” —

Sending an engineer into the state for purpose of supervising the installation of equipment is merely incidental to interstate commerce, and does not constitute “doing business” in this state. Creamery Package Mfg. Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 62 Wyo. 265, 166 P.2d 952,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1946).

Definition of “use” is necessary to avoid possible conflict with other statutory provisions.

County of Natrona v. Casper Air Serv., 536 P.2d 142,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1975).

“Used” is broad enough to include withdrawal of gasoline from storage within state

because tax imposed applies to dealers, distributors and storers the moment they withdraw it from storage. Texas Co. v. Siefried, 60 Wyo. 142, 147 P.2d 837,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 60 Wyo. 174, 150 P.2d 99 (Wyo. 1944).

Quoted

in

Exxon Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 783 P.2d 685,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Barcon, Inc. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 845 P.2d 373,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Cable television equipment or services as subject to sales or use tax, 5 ALR4th 754.

Cable Television Equipment or Services as Subject to Sales or Use Tax. 23 A.L.R.6th 165.

§ 39-16-102.
Administration; confidentiality.

This article is known and may be cited as the “Use Tax Act of 1937”.

The administration of this article is vested in the department of revenue.

No state employee or other person who by virtue of his employment has knowledge of the business affairs of any person filing or required to file any tax returns under this article shall make known their contents in any manner or permit any person to have access to any returns or information contained therein except as provided by law. The department may also allow the following:

The delivery to the taxpayer or his legal representatives upon written request of a copy of any return or report in connection with his tax;

The publication of statistics so classified to prevent the identification of particular returns or reports;

The inspection by the attorney general of the state of the report or return of any person who brings an action against the state, or against whom an action is contemplated or has been instituted;

The introduction into evidence of any report or return or information therefrom in any administrative or court proceeding to which the person making the report or return is a party;

The furnishing of any information to the United States government and its territories, the District of Columbia, any state allowing similar privileges to the department or to the multistate tax commission for relay to tax officials of cooperating states. Information furnished shall be only for tax purposes;

The inspection of tax returns and records by the office of the director of the state department of audit;

The sharing of information with local government entities and other state agencies, provided a written request is made to the department and the governmental entity or agency demonstrates sufficient reason to obtain the information for official business purposes.

The state preempts the field of imposing tax upon sales and storage, use and consumption of tangible personal property as provided by this article. No county, city, town or other political subdivision may impose, levy or collect taxes upon sales or storage, use or consumption of tangible personal property except as provided in this section.

Revenue collected pursuant to this section shall be administered in accordance with W.S. 39-16-202(c) and distributed in accordance with W.S.

39-16-211

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-16-103.
Imposition.

Taxable event. The following shall apply:

Persons making first use of taxable services or storing, using or consuming tangible personal property or specified digital products, except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, are liable for the tax imposed by this article. Specified digital products are only subject to the tax imposed by this article if the purchaser has permanent use of the specified digital product. A vendor who purchases specified digital products for further commercial broadcast, rebroadcast, transmission, retransmission, licensing, relicensing, distribution, redistribution or exhibition in whole or in part to another person shall be considered a wholesaler and not subject to the tax imposed by this article. Those services provided by a trade association as part of a member benefit are not subject to the tax imposed by this subparagraph. The liability is not extinguished until the tax has been paid to the state but a receipt given to the person by a registered vendor in accordance with paragraph (c)(i) of this section is sufficient to relieve the purchaser from further liability;

Specified digital products sold, services to repair, alter or improve tangible personal property sold and tangible personal property sold by any person for delivery in this state or where first use of the service occurs in this state is deemed sold for storage, use or consumption herein and is subject to the tax imposed by this article unless the person selling the property has received from the purchaser a signed certificate stating the property or service was purchased for resale and showing his name and address. Specified digital products are only subject to the tax imposed by this article as specified in paragraph (i) of this subsection;

Computer hardware, including the basic set of operating instructions called system software which is necessary to the basic operation of the computer hardware and hardware media used to transfer computer software programs are subject to the provisions of paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection.

Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

Specified digital products sold, services to repair, alter or improve tangible personal property sold and tangible personal property sold by any person for delivery in this state or where first use of the service occurs in this state is deemed sold for storage, use or consumption herein and is subject to the tax imposed by this article unless the person selling the property has received from the purchaser a signed certificate stating the property or service was purchased for resale and showing his name and address. Specified digital products are only subject to the tax imposed by this article as specified in paragraph (a)(i) of this section;

For purposes of W.S. 39-16-107(b)(ii), the sales price of motor vehicles, house trailers, trailer coaches, trailers or semitrailers as defined by W.S.

31-1-101

shall be declared by the purchaser upon a copy of the original invoice from the vendor or upon an affidavit furnished by the department if not purchased from a vendor and the tax collected shall be based upon the declaration or invoice;

Except for those vehicles specified under W.S. 39-16-107(b)(iv), the use tax imposed by this article upon a motor vehicle, house trailer, trailer coach, trailer or semitrailer purchased outside the state of Wyoming as a gift shall be collected from the donee prior to the first registration based upon the fair market value of the gift at the time of the gift;

The tax imposed by this article upon the sale of a transportable home shall be collected upon the first sale of the transportable home. The tax shall be collected on seventy percent (70%) of the sales price of the transportable home. No tax shall be collected upon any subsequent sale of the home.

Taxpayer. The following shall apply:

Except as otherwise provided, there is levied and shall be paid by the purchaser an excise tax at the same rate applied under W.S.

39-15-104

upon sales in Wyoming. The vendor shall collect the tax and give the purchaser a receipt therefor displaying the tax paid separately;

Persons making first use of taxable services or storing, using or consuming tangible personal property or specified digital products are liable for the tax imposed by this article. Specified digital products are only subject to the tax imposed by this article as specified in paragraph (a)(i) of this section. The liability is not extinguished until the tax has been paid to the state but a receipt given to the person by a registered vendor in accordance with paragraph (i) of this subsection is sufficient to relieve the purchaser from further liability;

For purposes of W.S. 39-16-107(b)(ii), the sales price of motor vehicles, house trailers, trailer coaches, trailers or semitrailers as defined by W.S.

31-1-101

shall be declared by the purchaser upon a copy of the original invoice from the vendor or upon an affidavit furnished by the department if not purchased from a vendor and the tax collected shall be based upon the declaration or invoice;

Except for those vehicles specified under W.S. 39-16-107(b)(iv), the use tax imposed by this article upon a motor vehicle, house trailer, trailer coach, trailer or semitrailer purchased outside the state of Wyoming as a gift shall be collected from the donee prior to the first registration based upon the fair market value of the gift at the time of the gift;

Every vendor shall collect the tax imposed by this article and is liable for the entire amount of taxes imposed;

Every person making first use of taxable services or storing, using or consuming tangible personal property or specified digital products purchased from a vendor who does not maintain a place of business in this state is liable for the tax imposed by this article. Specified digital products are only subject to the tax imposed by this article as specified in paragraph (a)(i) of this section;

If any vendor discontinues his business or sells his stock of goods he shall make a final return and payment within thirty (30) days thereafter. His successor in business shall withhold from the purchase price an amount equal to any taxes, penalty or interest due until the time the former owner produces a receipt from the department showing that all amounts due have been paid or a certificate that no taxes are due. If the successor fails to withhold from the purchase price the amount due he is liable for same;

Any tax due under this article constitutes a debt to the state from the persons who are parties to the transaction and is a lien from the date due on all the property of those persons. The tax lien shall have preference over all liens except any valid mortgage or other liens of record filed or recorded prior to the date the tax became due. When the tax is collected by a retailer or his agent, the tax lien has the same status as sales tax liens under W.S. 39-15-108(d)(i).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 132, § 1; 2010, ch. 64, § 1; 2014 ch. 64, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(i), inserted “or specified digital products, except as otherwise provided in this paragraph,” and inserted the present second through fourth sentences; in (a)(ii) and (b)(i), inserted “Specified digital products sold and,” and the present last sentence; in (c)(ii) and (c)(iv), inserted “or specified digital products,” and the present second sentence.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, inserted “making first use of taxable services or” in the first sentence of (a)(i); “services to repair, alter or improve tangible personal property sold,” or where first use of the service occurs in this state,” and or service in the first sentences of (a)(ii) and (b)(i); “making first use of taxable services or” in the first sentence of (b)(ii) and (b)(vi).

Section applicable to out-of-state nonvendors. —

Subsection (b) permits the imposition of an excise tax on transactions involving the sale of tangible personal property purchased out-of-state from nonvendors and stored, used or consumed in Wyoming. Barcon, Inc. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 845 P.2d 373,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1992).

Applied

in

United Pac. Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Excise Tax Div., 713 P.2d 217,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 456

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

Exxon Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 783 P.2d 685,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Use tax on property purchased by nonresident in another state, 41 ALR2d 535.

Sales or use tax on motor vehicle purchased out of state, 45 ALR3d 1270.

Computer software or printout transactions as subject to state sales or use tax, 91 ALR3d 282.

Reusable soft drink bottles as subject to sales or use taxes, 97 ALR3d 1205.

Transportation, freight, mailing, or handling charges billed separately to purchaser of goods as subject to sales or use taxes, 2 ALR4th 1124.

Cable television equipment or services as subject to sales or use tax, 5 ALR4th 754.

State or local sales, use or privilege tax on sales or, or revenues from sales of, advertising space or services, 40 ALR4th 1114.

Computer software or printout transactions as subject to state sales or use tax, 36 ALR5th 133.